Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.630

Joint powers and duties with board.

(1) The secretary of state and the board created in RCW 29A.04.510 shall jointly adopt rules, in the manner specified for the adoption of rules under the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, governing:

(a) The training of persons officially designated by major political parties as elections observers under this title, and the training and certification of election administration officials and personnel;

(b) The policies and procedures for conducting election reviews under RCW 29A.04.570; and

(c) The policies and standards to be used by the board in reviewing and rendering decisions regarding appeals filed under RCW 29A.04.570.

(2) The board created in RCW 29A.04.510 may adopt rules governing its procedures.

[ 2003 c 111 s 163; 1992 c 163 s 4. Formerly RCW 29.60.020.]